Tennessee, session 114, SB0782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-701(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "thirty-five (35) days" and substituting instead the language "forty (40)
days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0782
002751
- 1 -